Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1834.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 5013.4 of Title 74, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving


fund for the Oklahoma Department of Commerce to be designated the


“Oklahoma Main Street Revitalization Revolving Fund”. The fund


shall be a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations,


and shall consist of all monies designated to the fund by law. All


monies accruing to the credit of the fund are hereby appropriated


and may be budgeted and expended by the Department for the purpose

Req. No. 3319 Page 1


of matching contributions made by applicants to the Oklahoma Main


Street Revitalization Grant Program. Expenditures from the fund


shall be made upon warrants issued by the State Treasurer against


claims filed as prescribed by law with the Director of the Office of


Management and Enterprise Services for approval and payment.


B. In order to be considered for a grant from the fund, a Main


Street community shall apply to the Oklahoma Main Street


Revitalization Grant Program, as established in Section 2 of this


act.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 5013.5 of Title 74, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The Oklahoma Department of Commerce shall establish the


Oklahoma Main Street Revitalization Grant Program. The program


shall include development of grants to match investments made by


applicants seeking to develop, construct, or improve the quality of


life in certified Main Street communities in this state through


projects that include, but are not limited to:


1. Investment in facades or buildings in Main Street areas;


2. Landscaping that beautifies Main Street areas;


3. Investment in lighting, sidewalks, sound systems, or other


amenities that improve safety and the public experience;


4. Distinctive sculptural installations or other public art; or



Req. No. 3319 Page 2


5. Investment in infrastructure that improves viability of


downtown residences or improves access to real estate in the Main


Street area.


B. In order to ensure fair and equitable distribution of grants


from the program, the Oklahoma Department of Commerce Board shall


promulgate rules for administering, determining priority of,


approving and funding applications for such funds including, but not


limited to:


1. If a qualified entity has previously been approved for or


received such funds and makes a subsequent application, that


subsequent application may be assigned lower priority than an


application by qualified entities who have not previously been


approved for or received such funds;


2. In order to prevent substantially the same entity or area


from receiving an undue advantage, a political subdivision and all


its public trusts and similar subordinate entities shall be treated


as one qualified entity; and


3. The Board may establish limited time periods for processing


applications for available funds.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3319 BRC 1/14/2026 11:13:18 PM





Req. No. 3319 Page 3